Idaho, session 2026, S1375.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Health and Human Services
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs
and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027:


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE:
I. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
A. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $18,538,400 $4,677,100 $23,215,500
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 76,500 20,000 96,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 30,851,600 5,928,500 36,780,100
TOTAL $49,466,500 $10,625,600 $60,092,100
B. FOSTER & ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $29,996,300 $29,996,300
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 150,000 150,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 31,306,700 31,306,700
TOTAL $61,453,000 $61,453,000
DIVISIONTOTAL $49,466,500 $10,625,600 $61,453,000 $121,545,100
II. EARLY LEARNING & DEVELOPMENT:
A. EARLY LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $8,453,200 $1,505,600 $2,860,200 $12,819,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 131,100 46,300 783,100 960,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 6,009,600 1,860,500 2,853,500 10,723,600
TOTAL $14,593,900 $3,412,400 $6,496,800 $24,503,100


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $24,800 $1,175,000 $1,199,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 676,100 $1,604,600 60,784,400 63,065,100
TOTAL $700,900 $1,604,600 $61,959,400 $64,264,900
C. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $5,967,300 $439,300 $91,300 $6,497,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 345,500 137,800 10,600 493,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 4,393,300 1,562,500 147,200 6,103,000
TOTAL $10,706,100 $2,139,600 $249,100 $13,094,800
DIVISIONTOTAL $26,000,900 $7,156,600 $68,705,300 $101,862,800
III. FAMILY AND COMMUNITY PARTNERSHIPS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $430,200 $133,400 $450,000 $1,013,600
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 19,500 50,000 69,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 3,005,000 270,900 2,900,000 6,175,900
TOTAL $3,435,200 $423,800 $3,400,000 $7,259,000
IV. DIVISION OF WELFARE:
A. SELF-RELIANCE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $19,674,300 $5,565,000 $25,239,300


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 862,100 3,539,000 4,401,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 32,918,900 17,333,000 50,251,900
TOTAL $53,455,300 $26,437,000 $79,892,300
B. BENEFIT PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $19,630,600 $19,630,600
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 500,000 500,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 32,318,800 32,318,800
TOTAL $52,449,400 $52,449,400
DIVISIONTOTAL $53,455,300 $26,437,000 $52,449,400 $132,341,700
V. DIVISION OF MEDICAID:
A. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MGMT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $13,184,000 $14,230,400 $5,205,700 $32,620,100
Medicaid Management Information Systems Dedicated
Fund 82,900 82,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 461,600 8,883,800 9,345,400
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 108,400 142,300 250,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 18,710,400 37,158,800 19,518,700 75,387,900
TOTAL $32,547,300 $60,415,300 $24,724,400 $117,687,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $324,757,700 $324,757,700
Hospital Assessment
Fund 103,577,700 103,577,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,445,100 1,445,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 853,459,000 853,459,000
TOTAL $1,283,239,500 $1,283,239,500
C. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $317,708,200 $317,708,200
Hospital Assessment
Fund 4,172,700 4,172,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 347,297,000 347,297,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 752,848,700 752,848,700
TOTAL $1,422,026,600 $1,422,026,600
D. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $202,906,400 $202,906,400
Hospital Assessment
Fund 115,270,400 115,270,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,023,000 1,023,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 582,661,100 582,661,100
TOTAL $901,860,900 $901,860,900


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
E. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $89,470,200 $89,470,200
Hospital Assessment
Fund 25,064,800 25,064,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 196,248,900 196,248,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,010,215,500 1,010,215,500
TOTAL $1,320,999,400 $1,320,999,400
F. EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $299,900 $91,700 $2,969,800 $3,361,400
DIVISIONTOTAL $32,847,200 $60,507,000 $4,955,820,600 $5,049,174,800
VI. PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES:
A. PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,309,000 $969,700 $1,678,900 $4,957,600
Cancer Control
Fund 76,000 205,000 82,600 363,600
Central Tumor Registry
Fund 360,000 360,000
Rural Nursing Loan Repayment
Fund 875,000 875,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 3,176,900 5,712,700 12,386,200 21,275,800
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 2,406,000 2,100,000 4,506,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 11,230,500 17,967,500 35,005,100 64,203,100
TOTAL $16,792,400 $27,620,900 $52,127,800 $96,541,100
B. LABORATORY SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,369,900 $716,000 $3,085,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 498,400 273,800 772,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,352,600 939,300 2,291,900
TOTAL $4,220,900 $1,929,100 $6,150,000
C. SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $361,200 $316,600 $1,129,400 $1,807,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 115,000 80,000 195,000
TOTAL $361,200 $431,600 $1,209,400 $2,002,200
D. HEALTH CARE POLICY INITIATIVES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $117,500 $32,700 $142,000 $292,200
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 81,400 75,000 156,400
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 119,200 33,000 356,300 508,500
TOTAL $318,100 $140,700 $498,300 $957,100
DIVISIONTOTAL $21,692,600 $30,122,300 $53,835,500 $105,650,400


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
VII. INDIRECT SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $12,185,100 $8,525,700 $20,710,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,626,200 1,502,100 3,128,300
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 14,142,500 9,780,300 23,922,800
TOTAL $27,953,800 $19,808,100 $47,761,900
VIII. LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,084,900 $251,400 $2,336,300
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,037,300 12,200 1,049,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 4,791,100 639,600 5,430,700
TOTAL $7,913,300 $903,200 $8,816,500
IX. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Prevention of Minors' Access to Tobacco
Fund $21,800 $21,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $7,000 438,300 445,300
Liquor Control
Fund 533,900 $116,100 650,000
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 320,000 1,600,000 1,920,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 761,800 3,460,200 19,302,300 23,524,300
TOTAL $1,302,700 $4,240,300 $21,018,400 $26,561,400


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
X. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
A. CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $3,759,200 $2,715,000 $1,550,400 $8,024,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 2,661,600 1,904,400 1,812,600 6,378,600
TOTAL $6,420,800 $4,619,400 $3,363,000 $14,403,200
B. ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $13,510,300 $4,249,600 $7,960,700 $25,720,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,085,700 1,165,300 778,700 3,029,700
TOTAL $14,596,000 $5,414,900 $8,739,400 $28,750,300
DIVISIONTOTAL $21,016,800 $10,034,300 $12,102,400 $43,153,500
XI. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. COMMUNITY HOSPITALIZATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $534,800 $4,249,900 $4,784,700
B. STATE HOSPITAL NORTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $9,415,100 $852,900 $45,600 $10,313,600
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 2,579,000 382,200 2,961,200
State Hospital North Endowment Income
Fund 652,800 1,192,600 104,400 1,949,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,709,300 0 0 1,709,300
TOTAL $14,356,200 $2,427,700 $150,000 $16,933,900


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $6,678,900 $225,200 $5,300 $6,909,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 13,774,200 3,339,100 900 17,114,200
Mental Hospital Endowment Income
Fund 5,446,400 2,208,700 284,700 7,939,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 5,586,500 893,100 20,300 6,499,900
TOTAL $31,486,000 $6,666,100 $311,200 $38,463,300
D. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,694,100 $468,700 $8,300 $2,171,100
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 4,154,400 1,783,800 5,938,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 4,400 0 0 4,400
TOTAL $5,852,900 $2,252,500 $8,300 $8,113,700
DIVISIONTOTAL $51,695,100 $11,881,100 $4,719,400 $68,295,600
XII. INDEPENDENT COUNCILS:
A. DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $205,800 $20,100 $225,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 15,000 15,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 497,200 275,900 $31,600 804,700
TOTAL $703,000 $311,000 $31,600 $1,045,600


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $198,300 $79,200 $277,500
Domestic Violence Project
Fund 219,500 164,600 $171,800 555,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 40,000 40,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 318,300 269,200 12,515,400 13,102,900
TOTAL $736,100 $553,000 $12,687,200 $13,976,300
DIVISIONTOTAL $1,439,100 $864,000 $12,718,800 $15,021,900
(2) STATE INDEPENDENT LIVING COUNCIL:
FROM:
General
Fund $173,700 $109,900 $283,600
State Independent Living Council (Ded)
Fund 312,200 94,800 407,000
TOTAL $485,900 $204,700 $690,600
GRANDTOTAL $298,704,400 $183,208,000 $5,246,222,800 $5,728,135,200
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in Health and Human Services listed below
is authorized no more than the following number of full-time equivalent po-
sitions at any point during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027,
unless specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appro-
priations Committee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so
authorized.
Youth Safety and Permanency ..................................500.53
Early Learning and Development ...............................142.83
Idaho Child Care Program .......................................5.50
Southwest Idaho Treatment Center .............................111.00
Family and Community Partnerships .............................38.55
Division of Welfare ..........................................609.50
Division of Medicaid .........................................303.50


Public Health Services .......................................214.22
Indirect Support Services ....................................244.75
Licensing and Certification ...................................68.00
Substance Abuse Treatment and Prevention .......................12.00
Children's Mental Health ......................................53.80
Adult Mental Health ..........................................132.00
State Hospital North .........................................137.19
State Hospital South .........................................300.41
State Hospital West ...........................................53.99
Developmental Disabilities Council .............................6.00
Domestic Violence Council ......................................5.00
State Independent Living Council ...............................4.00
SECTION 3. GENERAL FUND TRANSFERS. As appropriated, the Office of the
State Controller shall periodically make transfers from the General Fund to
the Cooperative Welfare Fund as requested by the director of the Department
of Health and Welfare and approved by the Board of Examiners.
SECTION 4. TRUSTEE AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS. Notwithstanding the provi-
sions of Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, funds appropriated in Section 1 of this
act in the trustee and benefit payments expense class shall not be trans-
ferred to any other expense classes for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027.
SECTION 5. PROGRAM INTEGRITY. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare shall be required
to provide those services authorized or mandated by law in each program, only
to the extent of funding and available resources appropriated for each bud-
geted program.
SECTION 6. EDUCATIONAL NEEDS. The Department of Health and Welfare
shall be responsible for the educational needs of school-age children placed
in its custody by the judicial branch for either child protective issues or
mental health issues. If the department places a child in a licensed resi-
dential treatment facility that includes a nonpublic accredited school and
it is determined by the department that it is in the best interests of the
child to be educated at the residential treatment facility, then it is the
responsibility of the department to pay for such education per student, per
educational day. Other Idaho state agencies shall not be precluded from
exercising their responsibility to ensure a free and appropriate education
for these students within the requirements of federal disability law. The
fiscal impact of this section is included within existing department base
appropriations.
SECTION 7. CHILD ABUSE PROTECTION AND TREATMENT ACT FUNDS. Of the
amount appropriated in Section 1 of this act from the Cooperative Welfare
(Federal) Fund, a minimum of $42,000 of federal Child Abuse Protection and
Treatment Act funds appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare
shall be provided to the public health districts each year. Funds for each
public health district shall be distributed at one-seventh (1/7) of the


total amount, which shall be used for the citizen review panels pursuant to
Section 16-1647, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. MEDICAID TRACKING REPORT. The Department of Health and Wel-
fare's Division of Medicaid and Division of Indirect Support Services shall
deliver a report that compares the Medicaid appropriation, distributed by
month for the year, to the actual expenditures and remaining forecasted ex-
penditures for the year on a monthly basis to the Legislative Services Office
and the Division of Financial Management. The report shall also include a
forecast, updated monthly, of the next fiscal year's anticipated trustee and
benefit expenditures. The format of the report and the information included
therein shall be determined by the Legislative Services Office and the Divi-
sion of Financial Management.
SECTION 9. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding the provisions
of Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, funding provided for the trustee and bene-
fit payments expense class in the Department of Health and Welfare's Divi-
sion of Medicaid may be transferred in excess of ten percent (10%) among the
Coordinated Medicaid Plan, Enhanced Medicaid Plan, Basic Medicaid Plan, Ex-
pansion Medicaid Plan, and Medicaid Administration and Medical Management
Programs, but shall not be transferred to any other budgeted program or ex-
pense class within the Department of Health and Welfare for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 10. MEDICAID MANAGED CARE IMPLEMENTATION. The Department of
Health and Welfare's Division of Medicaid shall provide a report to the
Legislative Services Office and the Division of Financial Management on
progress in integrating managed care approaches into the state Medicaid
system. The format of the report and information contained therein shall be
determined by the Legislative Services Office and the Division of Financial
Management. The report shall be submitted no later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 11. COST-SHARING REQUIREMENT. The Department of Health and
Welfare shall implement cost-sharing in the Division of Medicaid, as re-
quired by Section 56-257, Idaho Code, to the maximum extent that is federally
allowable for the expanded population of children whose families' gross
taxable income exceeds one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) but does not
exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the federal poverty limit, for Medic-
aid-eligible services as identified in House Bill No. 43, as enacted by the
First Regular Session of the Sixty-fourth Idaho Legislature.
SECTION 12. CASH TRANSFER. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of
this act from the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund, there is hereby appro-
priated and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $640,000 from
the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund to the Rural Physician Incentive Fund
on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable, for the Department of
Health and Welfare for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 13. BUDGET INTEGRITY. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, and consistent with its cost containment strategy,


the Department of Health and Welfare's Division of Medicaid shall submit
its budget request in accordance with applicable Idaho law as of the date
of submission. This section does not prohibit the agency or Governor from
making requests of the Legislature that would impact any portion of the
department's budget. However, any proposed changes to Idaho Code with an
anticipated budgetary impact shall be identified in the agency budget re-
quest and Governor's budget recommendation in narrative form only, without
numerical entries. Further, the department shall submit its budget request
based on the forecasted amount for the most recent month available from the
report identified in Section 8 of this act and for the estimated needs of
maintaining operations of the division.
SECTION 14. SMOKING CESSATION. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1
of this act, $2,100,000 from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund shall be dis-
tributed to the public health districts for the purpose of prevention and
cessation programs for tobacco, vape, and other substances as funds allow.
These moneys shall be distributed to each district based on the approved for-
mula of the board of trustees of the Idaho district boards of health as pro-
vided in Section 39-411(6), Idaho Code.
SECTION 15. PROJECT FILTER ALLOWABLE USES. Of the amount appropriated
in Section 1 of this act, $2,406,000 from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund
shall be expended for the purpose of prevention and cessation programs from
tobacco, vape, and other substances as funds allow. No moneys for Project
Filter from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund shall be used for sponsorships
or passive advertising.
SECTION 16. REPORTS ON FACILITY LICENSING AND CERTIFICATIONS. The De-
partment of Health and Welfare's Licensing and Certification Program shall
provide biannual reports to the Legislative Services Office Budget and Pol-
icy Analysis Division and the Division of Financial Management on the sta-
tus of facility licensing and certifications as well as staff workload and
caseload issues. The format of the report and the type of information in-
cluded therein shall be determined by the Legislative Services Office and
the Division of Financial Management. The first report shall be submitted
no later than December 31, 2026, and the second report shall be submitted no
later than June 30, 2027.
SECTION 17. LIMITING TRANSFER OF LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS. Notwith-
standing the provisions of Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, moneys appropriated
from the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund to the Department of Health and
Welfare's Divisions of Mental Health Services and Psychiatric Hospitaliza-
tion may be transferred between divisions but shall not be transferred to any
other division or program within the Department of Health and Welfare with-
out legislative approval.
SECTION 18. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH COMMUNITY CRISIS CENTERS. The seven be-
havioral health community crisis centers shall submit a report that indi-
cates the levels of funding support by fund source. The format of the report
and the information included therein shall be determined by the Legislative


Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division. The contents of these
reports shall aid in providing a clearer understanding of the financial sit-
uations of the behavioral health community crisis centers. These reports
shall be submitted by the Department of Health and Welfare to the Legislative
Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division no later than December
31, 2026.
SECTION 19. STATE OPIOID RESPONSE GRANT. Funds available for naloxone
shall be available only to first responders for distribution in the state of
Idaho.
SECTION 20. IDAHO MILLENNIUM INCOME FUND. Of the funds appropriated
from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund in Section 1 of this act, $250,000
shall be used by Idaho Drug Free Youth to support its various programs,
including its annual youth summit, program chapters, and drug free school
coordinators. Idaho Drug Free Youth shall provide to the Department of
Health and Welfare a document that demonstrates operational and fiscal ac-
countability for the supported programs. Idaho Drug Free Youth shall work
collaboratively with the Department of Health and Welfare and shall sign an
attestation letter or equivalent document that ensures funds will be used in
accordance with this section, in accordance with Section 21 of this act, and
in accordance with any other applicable rule or law and accounted for using
generally accepted accounting principles.
SECTION 21. IDAHO DRUG FREE YOUTH OVERSIGHT. (1) The Department of
Health and Welfare shall provide oversight for the funds provided in Section
20 of this act for Idaho Drug Free Youth. The Department of Health and Wel-
fare shall:
(a) Provide four distributions of $62,500 for a total distribution of
$250,000. Distributions shall occur no later than July 15, 2026, Octo-
ber 15, 2026, January 15, 2027, and April 15, 2027;
(b) Receive and compile two reports from Idaho Drug Free Youth and
transmit each report to the Legislative Services Office Budget and Pol-
icy Analysis Division on behalf of the Joint Millennium Fund Committee
by December 30, 2026, and by June 30, 2027, or as soon thereafter as is
practicable. The format of the report and the content therein shall be
determined by the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analy-
sis Division;
(c) Withhold or recover distributions pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection if Idaho Drug Free Youth is not operating or has indicated it
intends to no longer operate prior to the close of the fiscal year, if it
does not provide any of the required reports, or otherwise as needed to
address legal or fiscal concerns regarding funds provided to Idaho Drug
Free Youth; and
(d) Assist Idaho Drug Free Youth, as needed, to ensure services are be-
ing provided as intended by this act and to meet the needs of program
participants.
(2) The Department of Health and Welfare shall not have the authority to
directly manage Idaho Drug Free Youth or direct Idaho Drug Free Youth to per-
form functions not required by this section or Section 20 of this act. The


Department of Health and Welfare shall assist Idaho Drug Free Youth to ensure
funds are used in accordance with this act. If the Department of Health and
Welfare has reason to believe funds are misused in violation of this section
or Section 20 of this act, or any rule or law, the Department of Health and
Welfare may withhold funds until Idaho Drug Free Youth is in compliance with
this act and applicable law. The Department of Health and Welfare shall im-
mediately notify the Legislative Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis
Division on behalf of the Joint Millennium Fund Committee of any misuse or
perceived misuse of funds. The Department of Health and Welfare shall work
collaboratively with Idaho Drug Free Youth to develop an appropriate correc-
tive action plan.
SECTION 22. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Commu-
nity Hospitalization Program is hereby exempted from the provisions of Sec-
tion 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the Commu-
nity Hospitalization Program from other programs within the Department of
Health and Welfare for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 23. ACQUISITIONS. (1) Consistent with the provisions of Chap-
ter 92, Title 67, Idaho Code, the Idaho Department of Health and Welfare is
encouraged to engage in open, competitive acquisition processes. For all
acquisitions during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, for prop-
erty, services, or settlement valued at more than $1,000,000, the Idaho De-
partment of Health and Welfare shall make a report to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee when the acquisition process includes:
(a) Any targeted requests for information or questions conveyed on be-
half of external stakeholders by the Office of the Governor; or
(b) Facilitation or coordination of meetings or communications with
potential or actual bidders by the Office of the Governor.
(2) Such report shall be made by the Idaho Department of Health and Wel-
fare to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the Legislative Ser-
vices Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division within 30 business days of
such contact and include:
(a) The nature and purpose for contact from the Office of the Governor;
(b) The amount of the contract for property, services, or settlement
subject to the acquisition process;
(c) The duration of the contract for property, services, or settlement;
(d) The parties involved;
(e) The subject; and
(f) Whether the acquisition was part of or awarded as a result of an
open, competitive acquisition process or a sole source or other noncom-
petitive procurement pursuant to Section 67-9221, Idaho Code.
SECTION 24. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are


authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 25. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 26. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.